Hawaii statutes.
§489N-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Hawaii resident" includes aliens
lawfully admitted for permanent residence and residing in Hawaii.

"International matchmaking
organization" means a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity,
whether or not organized under the laws of the United States or any state, that
does business in the United States and for profit offers to residents of this
State, dating, matrimonial, or social referral services involving citizens of a
foreign country or countries who are not residing in the United States, by:

(1) An exchange of names, telephone numbers,
addresses, or statistics;

(2) Selection of photographs; or

(3) A social environment provided by the organization
in a country other than the United States.

"Marital history information" means a
declaration of a Hawaii resident's current marital status, the number of times
the Hawaii resident has previously been married, the number of domestic abuse
orders of protection issued against the Hawaii resident, and whether any
previous marriages by the Hawaii resident occurred as a result of receiving
services from an international matchmaking organization.

"Recruit" means a noncitizen,
nonresident person, recruited by an international matchmaking organization for
the purpose of providing dating, matrimonial, or social referral services. [L
2003, c 149, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 74, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next